Utah statutes.
53A-9-104.   Evaluation program for placement and advancement on career ladders.

(1)  Each school district shall develop a program to evaluate its teachers for placement and advancement on the career ladder consistent with Title 53A, Chapter 10.  The evaluation procedure shall:

(a)  be fair, consistent, and valid according to generally accepted principles of personnel administration;

(b)  incorporate clearly stated job descriptions;

(c)  be in writing;

(d)  involve teachers in the development of the evaluation instrument; and

(e)  prior to any evaluation inform the teacher in writing about time frames in the evaluation procedure, the evaluation process, the types of criteria to be used in the evaluation and the factors to be evaluated and the procedure for requesting a review of the evaluation.

(2)  Nothing in this section precludes informal classroom observations.

